Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7810.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-1 entitled "State Tax
Officials" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-1-7. Interest on delinquent payments. Interest on delinquent payments and audit
limitations.
(a) Whenever the full amount of any state tax or any portion or deficiency, as finally
determined by the tax administrator, has not been paid on the date when it is due and payable,
whether the time has been extended or not, there shall be added as part of the tax or portion or
deficiency interest at the rate as determined in accordance with subsection (b) of this section,
notwithstanding any general or specific statute to the contrary.
(b) Each January 1 the tax administrator shall compute the rate of interest to be in effect
for that calendar year by adding two percent (2%) to the prime rate, which was in effect on October
1 of the preceding year, except:
(1) Before January 1, 2023, in no event shall the rate of interest exceed twenty-one percent
(21%) per annum nor be less than eighteen percent (18%) per annum;
(2) On and after January 1, 2023, in no event shall the rate of interest exceed twenty-one
percent (21%) per annum nor be less than twelve percent (12%) per annum except:
(i) For trust fund taxes as established by §§ 44-19-35 and 44-30-76, in no event shall the
rate of interest exceed twenty-one percent (21%) per annum nor be less than eighteen percent (18%)
per annum.; and

(3) On or after January 1, 2027, the interest rate on all delinquent tax payments shall be
twelve percent (12%) per annum, for all taxes, inclusive of trust fund taxes as established by §§ 44-
19-35 and 44-30-76.
(i) The interest rate assessed on all tax payments, including delinquent taxes, shall be the
rate in effect on the date of the notification of delinquency, and not the date of the original tax
obligation.
(c) “Prime rate” as used in subsection (b) of this section means the predominant prime rate
quoted by commercial banks to large businesses as determined by the board of governors of the
Federal Reserve System.
(d) Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, the tax
administrator shall waive interest and penalty on the taxable portion of each Paycheck Protection
Program loan taxed pursuant to §§ 44-11-11(a)(1)(iv), 44-14-11, and 44-30-12(b)(8) and forgiven
during tax year 2020 provided that the tax on that portion is paid in full on or before March 31,
2022. The tax administrator shall make available suitable forms with instructions for making tax
payments on the taxable portion of such forgiven Paycheck Protection Program loans.
(e) The tax administrator’s authority to audit taxpayers shall be limited to:
(1) A period of three years (3) years from the date of filing, except for cases involving
fraud, then the audit period shall not exceed seven (7) years from the date of filing.
(2) Under no circumstances shall the tax administrator initiate or conduct an audit,
investigation or tax collection for any period in excess of ten (10) years from the date of the original
filing or required filing deadline, whichever is later.
(3) The tax administrator shall be prohibited from requesting filings or attempting to collect
tax liabilities for any period in excess of seven (7) years from the date of filing or required filing
deadline, whichever is later, regardless of whether an audit has been initiated. The limitation
provided in this subsection shall apply without exception.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and shall apply to all
assessments, audits and tax payments, including delinquent taxes, initiated on or after that date.
========
LC005299
========
LC005299 - Page 2 of 3